Maryland, session 2026, HB1059.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb1059*

HOUSE BILL 1059
Article – Education
6–132.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “CONTINUING PROFESSIONAL DEVELOPMENT PROGRAM” MEANS
CONTINUING PROFESSIONAL DEVELOPMENT EXPERIENCES OR PROGRAMS
APPROVED BY THE DEPARTMENT.
(3) “PROFESSIONAL DEVELOPMENT POINT” MEANS A UNIT USED TO
RENEW TEACHER LICENSES EARNED THROUGH COMPLETION OF SPECIFIC
PROFESSIONALLY ALIGNED TASKS AND ASSIGNMENTS.
(B) THE STATE DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION, DIVISION OF EDUCATOR
EFFECTIVENESS SHALL EVALUATE ASIAN AMERICAN HISTORY TRAINING
PROGRAMS OFFERED BY THE FOLLOWING ENTITIES FOR INCLUSION IN THE
DEPARTMENT’S CONTINUING PROFESSIONAL DEVELOPMENT PROGRAM THROUGH
WHICH EDUCATORS EARN PROFESSIONAL DEVELOPMENT POINTS:
(1) THE SMITHSONIAN INSTITUTION;
(2) THE ASIAN AMERICAN EDUCATION PROJECT;
(3) TEACHER AAPI;
(4) THE ASIAN PACIFIC ISLANDER DESI AMERICAN RESOURCE
CENTER AT SAN DIEGO STATE UNIVERSITY;
(5) THE SIKH COALITION;
(6) THE NATIONAL COUNCIL FOR SOCIAL STUDIES; AND
(7) THE ASIAN AMERICAN FOUNDATION.
(C) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PUBLICIZE THE AVAILABILITY OF TRAINING
PROGRAMS INCLUDED IN THE DEPARTMENT’S CONTINUING PROFESSIONAL
DEVELOPMENT PROGRAM.
(D) (1) THERE IS AN ASIAN AMERICAN HISTORY GRANT PROGRAM.
(2) THE PURPOSE OF THE PROGRAM IS TO:

HOUSE BILL 1059 3
(I) PROVIDE EXPANDED ACCESS TO PROFESSIONAL
DEVELOPMENT IN ASIAN AMERICAN HISTORY TO EDUCATORS; AND
(II) PROVIDE FUNDING FOR SCHOOL LIBRARIES TO PURCHASE
MATERIALS ON ASIAN AMERICAN AND PACIFIC ISLANDER HISTORY.
(3) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADMINISTER THE PROGRAM.
(4) AN ELEMENTARY, MIDDLE, OR HIGH SCHOOL TEACHER MAY
SUBMIT AN APPLICATION TO THE DEPARTMENT TO RECEIVE A GRANT OF UP TO
$2,000 TO COVER COSTS RELATED TO OBTAINING PROFESSIONAL DEVELOPMENT
POINTS THROUGH A PROGRAM DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION.
(5) A SCHOOL LIBRARY MAY SUBMIT AN APPLICATION TO THE
DEPARTMENT TO RECEIVE A GRANT OF UP TO $1,000 PER YEAR TO PURCHASE
AGE–APPROPRIATE MATERIALS ON ASIAN AMERICAN AND PACIFIC ISLANDER
HISTORY.
(6) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2028 AND EACH FISCAL YEAR THEREAFTER,
THE GOVERNOR SHALL INCLUDE IN THE ANNUAL BUDGET BILL AN APPROPRIATION
OF $500,000 FOR THE PROGRAM.
(a) The State Department of Education shall establish a program designed to
assist with the accurate teaching of Asian American history in accordance with this section.
(b) (1) The Department shall identify existing courses and materials that can
be adapted into a professional development course on Asian American history for educators
in the State from the following entities:
(i) the Smithsonian Institution;
(ii) the Asian American Education Project;
(iii) Teach AAPI;
(iv) the Asian Pacific Islander Desi American Resource Center at San
Diego State University;
(v) the Sikh Coalition;
(vi) the National Council for Social Studies; and
(vii) the Asian American Foundation.

HOUSE BILL 1059
(2) Based on the material the Department is able to collect from the entities
described under paragraph (1) of this subsection, and using existing resources, the
Department shall make available a professional development course on Asian American
history by:
(i) developing a course;
(ii) adapting an existing course developed by an entity listed under
paragraph (1) of this subsection; or
(iii) making available an existing course offered by an entity listed
under paragraph (1) of this subsection.
(3) A professional development course offered in accordance with this
subsection shall be aligned with the State Board of Education’s existing social studies
standards.
(c) In the 2026–2027 and 2027–2028 school years, the Department shall identify
age–appropriate materials for use in instruction during Asian American history month and
disseminate the materials to each county board of education.
(d) In carrying out its duties under this section, the Department shall consult
with academics, organizations, and leaders with expertise in Asian American history.
(e) (1) On or before December 1, 2028, the State Department of Education
shall report on the results of its activities under this section, in accordance with § 2–1257
of the State Government Article, to the General Assembly.
(2) The Department shall include in its report under this subsection,
information about Asian American history that, in school years 2026–2027 and 2027–2028,
has been incorporated into the program of instruction in public schools in the State.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026. It shall remain effective for a period of 3 years and, at the end of June 30, 2029,
this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be abrogated and
of no further force and effect.